Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 8

Determination of Results

2-8-101. Meeting of county election commission following election.

The county election commission shall meet at its office upon completion of its duties under § 2-8-104, but no later than the third Monday after the election to compare the returns on the tally sheets, to certify the results as shown by the returns in writing signed by at least the majority of them, and to perform the duties prescribed by this chapter.

The commission may not recount any paper ballots, including absentee ballots.

Upon the completion of the vote tabulation on election night, each county election commission shall report unofficial results to the coordinator of elections in a form prescribed by the coordinator.

Any county election commission which fails to certify any election by the deadlines set forth in subsection (a), unless such failure is determined by the state election commission to be for good cause, shall forfeit any compensation due the members for the holding of such election. The chair of the state election commission shall promptly notify the chief fiscal officer of any county of such failure to certify under the provisions of this section.

Upon certifying the results of a referendum held by a municipality or county pursuant to title 57, the county election commission shall send certification of the results to the alcoholic beverage commission.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 306, § 8; T.C.A., § 2-801; Acts 2001, ch. 465, § 6; 2008, ch. 1108, § 5; 2013, ch. 179, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Voter Confidence Act.”

Acts 2001, ch. 465, § 1, provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as “The 2000 Presidential Election Debacle Reform Bill of 2001.”

Collateral References.

Parol evidence of election officials to impeach election returns. 46 A.L.R.2d 1385.

2-8-102. Undelivered returns.

If the returns from any polling place have not been delivered to the county election commission by the first day after an election, the commission shall employ either a special messenger, a member of its staff or a member of the commission to obtain the missing returns.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-802.

2-8-103. Form of returns — Sufficiency.

No return, poll list, or certificate made under this title may be disregarded or rejected for want of form or on account of its not being strictly in accordance with the requirements of this title if it can be clearly understood. Any such return or certificate signed by a majority of the election officials at the polling place is sufficient.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-803.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris, Elections, § 7.

2-8-104. Comparing votes from tally tapes to tabulated election results.

The commission, or such persons as it may designate, shall, as soon as possible after the election, compare the votes from the tally tapes of all appropriate sources to the tabulated election results. All candidates, their representatives, representatives of the political parties, and representatives of the press may be present during this process and shall be given ample opportunity to examine the tabulations. The commission shall create a written report of any revisions of any vote totals in such election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-804; Acts 2012, ch. 1101, § 7.

2-8-105. Certification of tabulation and results.

After completing the comparison of the returns, the county election commission shall make and certify the official tabulation and certification of results, showing both precinct and county totals, in the following manner:

In triplicate for the offices of governor, members of the general assembly, presidential and vice presidential elector, members of congress, judge, chancellor, or district attorney general;

In triplicate for questions submitted to the people of the entire state;

In duplicate for any other office not listed in subdivision (1) and for questions submitted to people of a part of the state; and

In triplicate for all primary elections.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 306, § 10; T.C.A., § 2-805.

Law Reviews.

Counting the Votes: Electronic Voting Irregularities, Election Integrity, and Public Corruption, 49 U. Mem. L. Rev. 979 (Summer 2019).

2-8-106. Mailing and filing of tabulation and certification.

The commission shall seal and mail the original of the official tabulation and certification of results prepared pursuant to § 2-8-105(1) and (2) to the secretary of state and take the postmaster's receipt for it and shall mail the first copy to the governor and take the postmaster's receipt for it. The remaining copy shall be filed with the county clerk and the commission shall take the clerk's receipt for it. The aforementioned statements may be delivered personally in lieu of mailing by the deadline set forth in § 2-8-101. In the case of a general election for the office of governor, an additional copy of the returns shall be sent directly to the speaker of the senate as provided by article III, § 2 of the Constitution of Tennessee.

The commission shall deliver the official tabulation and certification of results prepared pursuant to § 2-8-105(3) as follows:

If the election is for a county official, the original to the coordinator of elections and take the postmaster's receipt for it, and file the copy with the county clerk, and take the clerk's receipt for it;

If the election is for a municipal office, the original to the chief administrative offices of the municipality and the copy filed with the county clerk; and

If a question, the original to the coordinator of elections and take the postmaster's receipt for it, and the copy to be filed in the county clerk's office and take the clerk's receipt for it.

The commission shall seal and mail the original of the official tabulation and certification of results prepared pursuant to § 2-8-105(4) to the coordinator of elections and take the postmaster's receipt for it, mail a copy to the chair of the political party's state executive committee and take the postmaster's receipt for it, and deliver the remaining copy to the county clerk and take the clerk's receipt for it.

The official tabulation and certification of results forms to be utilized for elections, both primary and general, for the offices listed in § 2-13-202, and for any question submitted to the voters of the entire state shall be furnished by the coordinator of elections. The county election commission shall furnish the forms for all other elections.

The county election commission shall issue certificates of elections to each person elected except those to be commissioned by the governor.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 132, § 1; 1977, ch. 480, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 2-806; Acts 1980, ch. 609, § 1.

2-8-107. Disposition and keeping of pollbooks — Computerized counties.

The commission shall seal and forward all pollbooks containing the original poll list sheets to the secretary of state within ten (10) days after the election to be stored by the secretary of state for nine (9) years, and shall deposit the pollbooks containing the duplicate poll list sheets in the office of the county clerk to be stored by the county clerk for four (4) years in any secure place.

In computerized counties, the commission shall forward to the secretary of state electronically through the AES computer system a list of the names of all voters who participated in the election, verified as to its accuracy, on or before forty-five (45) days after the election, to be stored by the secretary of state for nine (9) years, and shall deposit the list in the office of the county clerk, either printed or in a CD-ROM format, to be stored by the clerk for six (6) years. The commission shall also forward to the secretary of state the list in a CD-ROM format in the time prescribed by law.

The election commission shall keep on file the voter signature list for six (6) years.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 2-807; Acts 1990, ch. 727, § 4; 1999, ch. 197, § 8; 2007, ch. 125, § 7.

2-8-108. Preservation of paper ballots and other ballot supplies.

The commission shall preserve all paper ballots for six (6) months after the election to which they were cast or offered to be cast and may then dispose of them. During the period in which they are preserved, the packages of ballots shall be kept securely locked and may be opened and the ballots examined only on court order or under chapter 18 of this title.

All other election documents such as applications for all ballots, spoiled and rejected ballots, voter affidavits, records of assistance to voters, etc., shall be preserved by the county election commission for six (6) months or longer if so ordered by a court or by the coordinator of elections. All election documents pertaining to a federal election shall be preserved by the county election commission for twenty-two (22) months.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 306, § 6; T.C.A., § 2-808; Acts 2009, ch. 218, § 8.

2-8-109. Messenger to bring county returns to the secretary of state.

The secretary of state may employ a special messenger to bring the returns filed with the county clerk if those sent by mail fail to arrive. The expenses of the messenger shall be paid out of the state treasury.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; 1979, ch. 306, § 9; T.C.A., § 2-809.

2-8-110. Public calculation and comparison of votes — Declaration of election — Certificates of election.

The governor, secretary of state and attorney general and reporter shall, as soon as the returns are received, publicly calculate and compare the votes received by each person for the office of member of the general assembly, presidential and vice presidential elector, member of congress, judge, chancellor, or district attorney general, and declare the person receiving the highest number of votes elected.

The secretary of state shall assure the preservation of the original certification of results executed under this section.

The governor shall furnish each person elected with a certificate of election, which shall also be a commission of office, signed by the governor and the secretary of state. The certificate shall be prima facie evidence of election. A duplicate original of the certificate of election as United States senator shall be sent to the president of the United States senate.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 306, § 3; T.C.A., § 2-810; Acts 1981, ch. 478, § 18; 1995, ch. 305, § 57.

Cross-References. Public officers commissioned, §8-18-106.

Law Reviews.

Counting the Votes: Electronic Voting Irregularities, Election Integrity, and Public Corruption, 49 U. Mem. L. Rev. 979 (Summer 2019).

2-8-111. Tie votes.

If there is a tie vote between the two (2) or more persons having the highest number of votes for an office, the state election commission shall cast the deciding vote except that:

The county legislative body may cast the deciding vote for offices filled by the votes of a single county or civil district, or, in the alternative, the legislative body may by resolution call for a run-off election between the tied candidates;

The municipal legislative body shall cast the deciding vote for municipal offices, or, in the alternative, the legislative body may by resolution call for a run-off election between the tied candidates;

The governor shall cast the deciding vote for representatives in congress;

The election shall be void if it is for senator in congress, and the governor shall immediately issue an order directing the holding of a special election for the office; and

The general assembly in joint convention shall cast the deciding vote for governor.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-811; Acts 1981, ch. 478, §§ 4, 5; 1991, ch. 73, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 58; 2013, ch. 449, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. County board of education election, OAG 96-150 (12/31/96).

T.C.A.§12-4-101(a)(1) would not prohibit an incumbent commissioner from voting for herself in a decision under T.C.A. §2-8-111, OAG 06-132 (8/15/06).

Resolving tie votes for elections in single county or civil districts. OAG 12-62, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 62 (6/7/12).

2-8-112. Messenger to bring county returns to general assembly.

The general assembly may, if it becomes necessary, send a special messenger for the copy of the returns of any particular county deposited with the county clerk. The expenses of the messenger shall be paid out of the state treasury.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 2-812.

2-8-113. Primary elections — Determination of results.

On the fourth Thursday after a primary election, the state coordinator of elections shall publicly calculate and compare the votes received by each person and declare who has been nominated for office in the primary or elected to the state executive committee. The candidates who receive the highest number of votes shall be declared elected or nominated; provided, that in order for any person to receive a party nomination by write-in ballots, such person must receive a number of write-in votes equal to or greater than five percent (5%) of the total number of registered voters of the district. However, this section shall not apply where there are candidates for the office involved listed on the official ballot.

The coordinator of elections may delegate the duty under subsection (a) to county primary boards with respect to offices to be elected by voters within a single county and, if requested by the state executive committee of a political party, shall delegate such duty to the county primary boards. The county primary boards shall send the results of the primary election to the state party executive committee unless the state party executive committee wishes to exercise its functions under this section as a party primary board. The state party executive committee may revoke or rescind its request that the coordinator of elections delegate such duty to the county primary boards.

Any person trying to receive a party nomination by write-in ballots shall complete a notice requesting such person's ballots be counted in each county of the district no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, fifty (50) days before the primary election. Such person shall only have votes counted in counties where such notice was completed and timely filed. Write-in candidates for the offices of governor, United States senator and representative in the United States congress shall file their notice with the state coordinator of elections. The notice shall be on a form prescribed by the coordinator of elections and shall not require signatures of any person other than the write-in candidate requesting ballots be counted. The coordinator of elections shall distribute such form to the county election commissions. Upon timely receiving the notice required by this subsection (c), the county election commission shall promptly inform the state coordinator of elections, the registry of election finance, as well as all other candidates participating in the affected election. A write-in candidate may withdraw the notice by filing a letter of withdrawal in the same manner as the original notice was filed no later than the fifth day before the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 131, § 1; 1975, ch. 150, § 1; 1977, ch. 480, § 4; T.C.A., § 2-813; Acts 2003, ch. 307, § 3; 2005, ch. 302, § 2; 2006, ch. 965, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 928, § 16; 2009, ch. 218, § 9; 2010, ch. 1137, § 1.

Cross-References. Primary elections, title 2, ch. 13.

Attorney General Opinions. A proposed amendment to the statute, which would change the requirement that write-in candidates in primary elections must receive at least five percent of the “total number of votes cast in the election” in order to win to five percent of the “registered voters in the district,” would indirectly affect independent candidates as the amendment would make it more difficult for write-in candidates for primary elections to meet the five percent requirement, OAG 02-069 (5/22/02).

A 30-day notice requirement in a proposed amendment to the statute referred to 30 days prior to primary election day, OAG 02-069 (5/22/02).

It would be constitutionally permissible to change the requirements for a write-in candidate to receive a party nomination by write-in ballots from five percent of the votes cast to five percent of the registered voters in the district, OAG 02-076 (6/27/02).

A proposed amendment to the statute, which would require a 30 day notice from a person trying to receive a party nomination by write-in ballots, was constitutionally defensible, OAG 02-076 (6/27/02).

Retroactive application of 2006 amendment, OAG 06-138 (9/8/06).

2-8-114. Primary elections — Tie votes.

If the coordinator of elections determines that there is a tie between the two (2) or more candidates for an office who have the highest number of votes, the tie shall be broken as prescribed in the rules of the political party.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1977, ch. 480, § 5; T.C.A., § 2-814.

2-8-115. Primary elections — Certification of nominees.

The coordinator of elections shall certify the names of the nominees of political parties to the county election commission of each county in which the nominees are candidates by the qualifying deadlines set in §2-5-101.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1977, ch. 480, § 6; T.C.A., § 2-815.

2-8-116. Right of candidate to receive certified copies of poll lists and tally sheets.

Each candidate has the right to have delivered to the candidate by the state election commission or the county election commission certified copies of all poll lists and tally sheets used in the counties in which the candidate ran, upon demand and payment of the regular legal fees.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-816.